Montana, session 2025, LC1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Mobile panic alert system required. (1) A school district shall
implement a mobile panic alert system that is capable of connecting diverse emergency services technologies
to ensure real-time coordination between multiple first responder agencies. The system must integrate with
local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile activations.
(2) A school district may implement additional strategies or systems to ensure real-time
coordination between multiple first responders in a school safety or security emergency.
(3) A school district shall ensure that all school building personnel receive training on the protocol
and appropriate use of the mobile panic alert system before the beginning of each school year.
(4) (a) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a list of approved mobile panic alert
systems. At a minimum, an approved system must:
(i) automatically alert designated school personnel by smartphone application, phone call, text
message, or other technology when an emergency response is initiated on-site;
(ii) provide emergency responders with floor plans, caller location, and other information to assist
emergency responders during a 911 call; and
(iii) integrate designated school personnel with emergency responders to provide real-time
situational updates during an emergency.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1521.1
(b) Approved mobile panic alert systems may include installation of panic buttons, deployment of
wearable panic alert devices, or any other technology that complies with the requirements of this section.

Section 2. Section 20-9-236, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-236. Transfer of funds -- improvements to school safety and security. (1) A school district
that has certified to the office of public instruction a current school safety plan or emergency operations plan
pursuant to 20-1-401 may transfer state or local revenue from any budgeted or nonbudgeted fund, other than
the debt service fund or retirement fund, to its building reserve fund in an amount not to exceed the school
district's estimated costs of improvements to school and student safety and security as follows:
(a) planning for improvements to and maintenance of school and student safety, including but not
limited to the cost of staffing for or services provided by architects, engineers, school resource officers,
counselors, and other staff or consultants assisting the district with improvements to school and student safety
and security;
(b) programs and training for school employees, students, parents, and community members
approved by the trustees to support school and student safety and security, including but not limited to active
shooter training, threat assessment practices pursuant to 20-1-401(3)(b), and restorative justice;
(c) installing or updating locking mechanisms and ingress and egress systems at public school
access points, including but not limited to systems for exterior egress doors and interior passageways and
rooms, using contemporary technologies;
(d) installing or updating bullet-resistant windows and barriers; and
(e) installing or updating emergency response systems using contemporary technologies as
required in [section 1].
(2) Any transfers made pursuant to subsection (1) are not considered expenditures to be applied
against budget authority. Any revenue transfers that are not encumbered for expenditures in compliance with
subsection (1) within 2 full school fiscal years after the funds are transferred must be transferred back to the
originating fund from which the revenue was transferred.
(3) The intent of this section is to increase the flexibility and efficiency of school districts without an
increase in local taxes. In furtherance of this intent, if transfers of funds are made from any school district fund
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1521.1
supported by a nonvoted levy, the district may not increase its nonvoted levy for the purpose of restoring the
transferred funds."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Transition. A school district shall begin installation or implementation of
a mobile panic alert system as required by [section 1] by July 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 1, part 4, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 1, part 4, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****